Utah statutes.
77-19-2.   Judgment of imprisonment -- Commitment.

If the judgment is for imprisonment, the sheriff of the county or other appropriate custodial officer designated by the court shall, upon receipt of a certified copy of the judgment, deliver the defendant to the warden of the state prison or keeper of the jail. Such custodial officer shall also deliver a certified copy of the judgment and take a receipt from the warden or keeper of the jail for the defendant and return it to the court.



Enacted by Chapter 15, 1980 General Session

